Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 12. Sale or Encumbrance of Assets

§ 17-20-1201.
Sale or disposition of assets of a cooperative utility.

A cooperative utility shall not sell, lease or otherwise dispose of all or any substantial portion of its property, when the action is not in the regular course of activities, except as provided in this section.

Before a meeting is held to vote on approval of disposition of all or a substantial portion of cooperative utility property, the board of directors shall:

Have the proposed disposition analyzed with respect to the effect on rates for utility services and the equity position of members. The analyses shall be performed by at least two (2) independent analysts with experience in utility rate setting and valuation of utility property;

Notify all cooperative utility members, at least ninety (90) days in advance, of a meeting to vote on disposition of cooperative utility property, enclosing a summary of the proposals for disposition of the property with the notice, and make available to any member the full proposal for inspection and copying at the principal office of the cooperative utility; and

The cooperative utility shall mail to all members of the cooperative utility a summary of any alternate purchase proposals that have been submitted within thirty (30) days of the meeting date, and make available to any member the full proposal for inspection and copying at the principal office of the cooperative utility.

A two-thirds (2/3) affirmative vote of all the members of the cooperative utility is required for any sale or disposition under this article.

This section is subject to the contractual obligations of the cooperative utility with power suppliers and other third parties.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-20-1202.
Mortgage or encumbrance of assets of a cooperative utility.

The board of directors, without authorization by the members, shall have full power and authority:

To borrow monies from any source and in such amounts as the board may from time to time determine; and

To mortgage or otherwise pledge or encumber any or all of the cooperative utility’s properties or assets as security therefor.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.